apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
LEXICON ienemuscase
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:á%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:á%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:á%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:á%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:á%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:á%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:á%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:sa%>j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:á%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:á%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:á%>jn K ;
 +Ess:sa%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:á%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:á%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:á%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:á%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:á%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:á%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:á%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:á%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:á%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:á%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:á%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:áj%> K ;
 
LEXICON enapcase
 +Sg+Nom:p%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:bu%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:bu%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:bu%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:bu%>j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:bu%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:bu%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:bu%>jn K ;
 +Ess:bu%>n K ;
 ienebucase ;

LEXICON ienebucase
 +Pl+Nom:bu%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:bu%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:bu%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:bu%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:bu%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:bu%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:bu%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:buj%> K ;

LEXICON juohkkahasjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ttja%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:ttja%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:ttja%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:dtja%>j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:ttja%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:ttja%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:ttja%>jn K ;
 +Ess:dtja%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ttja%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ttja%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:ttja%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:ttja%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ttja%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ttja%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ttja%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:ttja%>j K ;
 
LEXICON nubbecase
 +Sg+Gen:e%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:e%> NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe:e%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:e%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:e%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:i%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:e%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:i%>j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:i%>j NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe:i%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:i%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:i%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:i%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:i%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:i%>j K ;

LEXICON juobbácase
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe:#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:j NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe:j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
 

LEXICON gallicase
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe:#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 
LEXICON goappásjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:tj%>a K ;
 +Sg+Abe:tj%>a#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:tj%>av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:tj%>ij K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:tj%>as K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:tj%>an K ;
 +Sg+Com:tj%>ajn K ;
 +Ess:tj%>in K ;
 goappátjacase ;
 
LEXICON goappátjacase
 +Pl+Nom:tj%>a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:tj%>ij K ;
 +Pl+Abe:tj%>ij#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:tj%>ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:tj%>ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:tj%>ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:tj%>ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:tj%>ij K ;


LEXICON dimnacase
 +Attr: NAMÁK ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:j NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;

LEXICON divnnacase
 +Attr:na%> NAMÁK ;
 +Attr+Use/NG:na%> K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom:na%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%>v K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%> K ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jt K ;

LEXICON iind
 +Pron+Indef:%>0 K ;

! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Particles
! =========

LEXICON PCLE
+Pcle: # ;

LEXICON QPCLE
! +Qst+Pcle:%> # ; !Only Qst?
+Pcle: # ; ! only +Pcle, for sme harmonisation XXX

LEXICON Particle
aj PCLE ;
dal PCLE ;
!dat PCLE ; !XXX Really particle?
!de PCLE ; Moved to Adv and CC
gal PCLE ;
gul PCLE ;
galla PCLE ;
gus QPCLE ;
gu QPCLE ;
!gåla PCLE ; !Adv
ham PCLE ;
addjáj PCLE ;
juo PCLE ;
lik PCLE ;
nav PCLE ;
ga PCLE ;
så PCLE ;
máj PCLE ;
ban PCLE ;
rat PCLE ;
riek PCLE ;
vuojn PCLE ;
villap PCLE ;
villep PCLE ;
gis PCLE ;
má PCLE ;
na PCLE ; 
ná PCLE ;
då PCLE ;
iehtja PCLE ;



! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Adposition lexicon
! ===================

! First come the 3 continuation lexica, the division is based on Spiik
! and should probably be revised. Then comes the adpositions themselves.


! Assigning tags to the adpositions

LEXICON Pp
 +Po:%>0 K ;
 +Pr:%>0 K ;

LEXICON Postp
 +Po:%>0 K ;

LEXICON Prep
 +Pr:%>0 K ;


! The adposition list itself.


LEXICON Numeral					
 MILIJÅVNNÅ ;       ! a noun of its own		
 UNDERTUVSÁN ;      ! for generator under 1000	
 JUSTTUVSÁN ;       ! going via 1000		
 OVERTUVSÁN ;       ! for generator over 1000	
 OLD ;              ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.	
num-imprecise ;                              
COLLECTIVE ;                            
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;           ! for the arabic numerals !
 +Use/Circ: ROMAN ;            ! for the roman numerals	!
 +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ;     ! for §34 etc.		!
 +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ;  ! for ½ etc.			!
O-NL ;  







! We now run through the alphabetic numerals, ending up with the case
! inflection of the final number.

! Million, a noun of its own
! --------------------------

LEXICON MILIJÅVNNÅ					
milijåvnnå:milijåvnnå AKTA ;			
millijåvnnå:millijåvnnå AKTA ;
milijåvnåt+A+Ord:milijåvnåd9 VUOSTASJ ;	
millijåvnåt+A+Ord:millijåvnåd9 VUOSTASJ ;
 milliárdda:milliárdda AKTA ;		! Num or N?
milliárdat+A+Ord:milliárdad9 VUOSTASJ ;	

! Overtuvsán, for the numerals over 1000
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative
dakkárasj+Pron+Dem:dakkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dakkirasj+Pron+Dem:dakkira juohkkahasjcase ;
dákkárasj+Pron+Dem:dákkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dákkirasj+Pron+Dem:dákkira juohkkahasjcase ;
dåkkárasj+Pron+Dem:dåkkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dåkkirasj+Pron+Dem:dåkkira juohkkahasjcase ;
duokkárasj+Pron+Dem:duokkára juohkkahasjcase ;
duokkirasj+Pron+Dem:duokkira juohkkahasjcase ;
LEXICON Indefinite
ienemus+Pron+Indef:ienemus ienemuscase ;
enamus+Pron+Indef:enamus ienemuscase ;
enap+Pron+Indef:ena enapcase ;
ienep+Pron+Indef:iene enapcase ;
ienebu+Pron+Indef:iene ienebucase ; 
ålop+Pron+Indef:ålo enapcase ;
juohkkahasj+Pron+Indef:juohkkaha juohkkahasjcase ;
 juohkkehasj+Pron+Indef+Use/NG:juohkkeha juohkkahasjcase ; ! 
færttahasj+Pron+Indef:færttaha juohkkahasjcase ;
unnánasj+Pron+Indef:unnána juohkkahasjcase ;
 gájkkasasj+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:gájkkasa juohkkahasjcase ; !
færttasj+Pron+Indef:færtta goappásjcase ;
goappásj+Pron+Indef:goappá goappásjcase ;
goappátja+Pron+Indef:goappá goappátjacase ;
nubbe+Pron+Indef:nupp nubbecase ;
juobbá+Pron+Indef:juoppá%> juobbácase ;
gallegis+Pron+Indef:gallegis ienemuscase ;
avtagasj+Pron+Indef:avtaga juohkkahasjcase ;
gallegasj+Pron+Indef:gallega juohkkahasjcase ;
dimna+Pron+Indef:dimna%> dimnacase ;
divnna+Pron+Indef:divn divnnacase ;
irda iind ;
gájk#divna iind ;
gájk#divnas iind ;
sæbbmi iind ;
sæmmi iind ;
sæmme iind ;
sæmmá iind ;
enas iind ;
ihkenis iind ;
åbbånis iind ;
åvvånis iind ;
sudes iind ;  
makkirak iind ;
makkirik iind ;
makkárak iind ;
iesj#guhtik iind ;
juonenik iind ;
juokkirik iind ;
juokkirak iind ;
 juoppánik  iind ; !iness.
majduk iind ;
mejduk iind ;
mahku iind ;
aktas iind ;
guovtev iind ;
LEXICON Adposition
gaskal Prep ;
hærráj Postp ;
innis Pp ;
allelij Postp ;
allelin Pp ;
vuosstelis Postp ;
birális Pp ;
allelis Pp ;
såggela Pp ;
goabbel Pp ;
dåbbel Pp ;
dåbel Pp ;
oarjjelattjan Pp ;
báldas Postp ;
dåbelis Pp ;
badjela Pp ;
allelattjan Postp ;
badjel Pp ;
badjelasj Pp ;
badjelattjaj Postp ;
badjelin Postp ;
badjen Postp ;
dåbelij Pp ;
ukselij Postp ;
gávttuj Postp ;
bajebuj Pp ;
bajebun Pp ;
baktu Postp ;
bieles Postp ;
boaktjolij Postp ;
boaktjolis Postp ;
dåbela Pp ;
báldan Postp ;
bálldalij Pp ;
bálldalattjan Pp ;
bælláj Postp ;
dagá Postp ;
davebuj Pp ;
davebuttjaj Pp ;
davvelattjan Pp ;
davvelij Pp ;
davvelis Pp ;
diehti Postp ;
duobbela Pp ;
duobbelij Pp ;
duobbelin Pp ;
duobbelattjaj Pp ;
duogen Postp ;
duogev Postp ;
duohkelin Postp ;
duohkelattjan Postp ;
duoge Postp ;
duoppebun Pp ;
dábbela Pp ;
dábbelin Pp ;
dábbelattjan Pp ;
dáfos Postp ;
dáppebuj Pp ;
dåbbelij Pp ;
dåbelin Pp ;
dåbbelis Pp ;
dåbbelattjaj Pp ;
dåppebuj Pp ;
dåppelt Pp ;
gássjelabbo Pp ;
gaskan Postp ;
gaskas Postp ;
gaska Postp ;
gasskala Postp ;
gassko Pp ;
 goabbelij Prep ; ! Ill
 goabbelin Prep ; ! Ine
 goabbelis Prep ; ! Ela
guoktel Postp ;
guoran Postp ;
guorra Postp ;
guorran Postp ;
guovddelav Postp ;
guovddelis Postp ;
guovddelappot Pp ;
gáktuj Postp ;
jaskádabbo Pp ;
juobbela Postp ;
lagábun Pp ;
lagábuttjat Postp ;
lagábuttjan Postp ;
lahka Pp ;
lahkusin Postp ;
lullela Postp ;
lullelij Pp ;
lullelis Pp ;
lullelis Postp ;
lullelattjaj Postp ;
lullelattjaj Pp ;
lun0na:lun'na Postp ;
lunne Postp ;
lusa Postp ;
lusste Postp ;
manep Prep ;
maŋŋela Postp ;
maŋen Postp ;
maŋŋela Pp ;
maŋŋelattja Pp ;
maŋŋelin Pp ;
maŋŋelattjaj Postp ;
maŋŋáj Postp ;
mieddela Postp ;
miehtelij Postp ;
miehtáj Postp ;
milte Postp ; 
nali Postp ;
nalte Postp ;
nanna:nan'na Postp ;
nuorttal Pp ;
nuorttalij Pp ;
nuorttalis Pp ;
næjgga Postp ;
oarjebun Pp ;
oarjjela Pp ;
oarjjelis Pp ;
oavŋela Postp ;
oavŋelappot Postp ;
rádje Postp ;
rájen Postp ;
rájev Postp ;
radje Postp ;
rajes Postp ;
raje Postp ;
sieges Postp ;
sisá Postp ;
sissŋela Pp ;
sissŋelin Pp ;
sissŋelin Postp ;
sisŋelt Pp ;
såggelin Pp ;
váni Pp ;
vuolebusj Postp ;
vuolen Postp ;
vuolle Pp ;
vuollela Pp ;
vuollelattjaj Postp ;
vuollelij Pp ;
vuollelis Pp ;
vuosstij Postp ;
ålggola Pp ;
ålggolin Pp ;
ålgobuj Pp ;
åvddåj Postp ;
åvddål Postp ;
åvddål Pp ;
åvddålasj Pp ;
åvddålij Pp ;
åvddålis Pp ;
åvdebun Pp ;
åvdebuttjan Pp ;
LEXICON LÅGENAN					
lågenan#nubbe+A+Ord:lågenan#nupp nubbecase ;		 
LEXICON num-imprecise
galli+Num:galli gallicase ;
galla+Num:gall nubbecase ;
biel#nubbe+A+Ord:biel#nupp nubbecase ;		 
bielle#nubbe+A+Ord:bielle#nupp nubbecase ;        
